apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="v/olêr__vbmod" c="il n'y a pas d'impératif">
  <e>       <p><l>olêr</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyêr</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olent</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyent</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olu</l>       <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olus</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olua</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olues</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyu</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyus</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyua</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyues</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ôlo</l>       <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ôl</l>        <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uelo</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uel</l>       <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ôs</l>        <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ôt</l>        <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olens</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olons</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oléd</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oléde</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ôlont</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>olê</l>       <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olês</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olêt</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olans</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olâd</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olant</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyê</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyês</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyêt</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyans</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyâd</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyant</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>oliê</l><r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>oliês</l><r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>oliêt</l><r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>olians</l><r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>oliâd</l><r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>oliant</l><r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>odré</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrés</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrat</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrens</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odrons</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odréd</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odront</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>odrê</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odrên</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrês</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrêt</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrans</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odrians</l>   <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrâd</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odriâd</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odrant</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>odriant</l>   <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>olyo</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olyes</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olye</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olyens</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olyons</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olyâd</l>     <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olyont</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olésso</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olésses</l>   <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olésse</l>    <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oléssens</l>  <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oléssons</l>  <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olésséd</l>   <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oléssâd</l>   <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oléssont</l>  <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>olut</l>      <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oluront</l>   <r>olêr<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="volêr">           <i>v</i><par n="v/olêr__vbmod"/></e>
